Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 522.25 of Title 18, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Directed funding” or “directed funds” means any


contribution or donation made at the request, suggestion, or


direction of a foreign principal, whether or not routed through


intermediaries; and


2. “Foreign principal” means:

Req. No. 2598 Page 1


a. a foreign government adversary, foreign government


enterprise, or foreign government entity as defined in


Section 121 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. a foreign political party, association, or


organization,


c. any corporation or entity formed under foreign law or


owned or controlled, in whole or in part, by a foreign


entity,


d. any person who is not a United States citizen or


lawful permanent resident, or


e. any person or entity acting at the request,


suggestion, or direction of a foreign entity.


B. Any charitable organization operating in this state that


engages in executive lobbying or legislative lobbying as defined in


Rule 5.2 of the Rules of the Ethics Commission or public policy


advocacy shall file a disclosure with the Ethics Commission if the


charitable organization receives one or more contributions totaling,


in the aggregate, Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or more in a


calendar year from a foreign principal or principals from funds


directed by a foreign principal or principals.


C. The disclosure filed with the Ethics Commission shall


include:


1. The name and classification of the foreign principal;


2. The country of origin;

Req. No. 2598 Page 2


3. The amount and date of each contribution;


4. Any conditions or directives associated with the


contribution; and


5. The intended or actual use of the contribution, if


specified.


D. Disclosures shall be filed annually by January 31 for any


contributions received in the preceding calendar year from a foreign


principal. Any single contribution from a foreign principal


exceeding Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) shall be disclosed


within thirty (30) days of receipt.


E. The Ethics Commission shall maintain a publicly accessible


online database of all disclosures submitted pursuant to this


section.


F. Any charitable organization that knowingly fails to comply


with this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed


Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per violation. In


addition, charitable organizations may be suspended from engaging in


lobbying or public policy advocacy in this state for up to one (1)


year for willful noncompliance. The Attorney General and the Ethics


Commission shall have joint authority to enforce the provisions of


this section.


G. This section shall not apply to:


1. Contributions from federally recognized tribal nations,


tribal governments, or tribal enterprises; or

Req. No. 2598 Page 3


2. Contributions made to religious organizations, provided that


such contributions are used solely for religious observance,


worship, or instruction.


H. Nothing in this section shall be construed to infringe upon


constitutionally protected speech, association, or religious


practice, or to impose retroactive reporting requirements.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2598 BLB 1/15/2026 12:47:35 PM































Req. No. 2598 Page 4